Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Community Pharmacy Medication-assisted Therapy Pilot Program

194A.800.
Pilot program — Community pharmacy care for medication-assisted substance abuse therapy — Components — Report.

For the purposes of this section, “pilot program” means a program in a county or set of counties, or a subset or subsets of the population, as designated by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services and the Department for Behavioral Health, Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities.

A pilot program is established to analyze the outcomes and effectiveness of a community pharmacy care delivery model for medication-assisted therapy for treatment of substance abuse in order to ensure that the Commonwealth is:

Using approaches that have been shown to be effective;

Intervening early at important stages and transitions; and

Intervening in appropriate settings and domains.

Sources of data for the pilot program shall include, at a minimum, claims data from the Department for Medicaid Services, including claims data from Medicaid managed care organizations submitted to the Department for Medicaid Services.

As funds are available, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall initiate a pilot program to determine, collect, and analyze performance measurement data for a community pharmacy care delivery model for noncontrolled medication-assisted therapy as part of substance abuse treatment services to determine practices that increase access to treatment, reduce frequency of relapse, provide better outcomes for patients, and control health costs related to substance abuse treatment. Program components shall:

Use a community pharmacy care delivery model for noncontrolled medication-assisted therapy for the treatment of substance abuse, as authorized by the Kentucky Board of Pharmacy pursuant to KRS 315.010(25);

Include a wraparound services model that engages psychological and social support for the patient;

Establish collaborative relationships between detention facilities, drug courts, community pharmacists, and practitioners who provide psychosocial interventions to evaluate individuals’ eligibility for participation in a community pharmacy care delivery model for noncontrolled medication-assisted therapy; and

Include pilot program data collection designed to inform the outcomes and effectiveness of a community pharmacy care delivery model for medication-assisted therapy for treatment of substance abuse.

By December 31, 2019, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall provide a joint report to the Legislative Research Commission and the Office of the Governor that:

Details the findings of the pilot program; and

Includes recommendations based on the pilot program’s results for optimizing substance abuse treatment services provided in community pharmacies.

HISTORY:
2018 ch. 133, § 1, effective July 14, 2018.